Washington statutes.
RCW 7.110.025

Civil cause of action—Consent.

(1) A depicted individual who is identifiable and who suffers harm from a person's intentional disclosure or threatened disclosure of a fabricated intimate image without the depicted individual's consent has a cause of action against the person if the person knew or acted with reckless disregard for whether:

(a) The depicted individual did not consent to the disclosure; and

(b) The depicted individual was identifiable.

(2)(a) A depicted individual's consent to the creation of the fabricated intimate image does not by itself establish that the depicted individual consented to its disclosure.

(b) Consent is deemed validly given only if:

(i) It is set forth in an agreement written in plain language signed knowingly and voluntarily by the depicted individual; and

(ii) It includes a general description of the fabricated intimate image and, if applicable, the audiovisual work into which it will be incorporated.

(3) It is not a defense to an action under this section that there is a disclaimer stating that the fabricated intimate image of the depicted individual was unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not participate in the creation or development of the fabricated intimate image.

[ 2024 c 88 s 12.]